Maryland, session 2025, SB0316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or
2. a qualified generator lead line.
(ii) If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle OR SUBTITLE 12, PART II OF THIS TITLE, the Commission shall
exempt a person from the requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a person
may not apply to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction of
a qualified generator lead line unless:
1. at least 90 days before the filing of an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the person had in good faith offered the

SENATE BILL 316
electric company that owns that portion of the electric grid in Maryland to which the
qualified generator lead line would interconnect a full and fair opportunity for the electric
company to construct the qualified generator lead line; and
2. at any time at least 10 days before the filing of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the electric company:
A. did not accept from the person a proposal or a negotiated
version of the proposal under which the electric company would construct the qualified
generator lead line; or
B. stated in writing that the electric company did not intend
to construct the qualified generator lead line.
7–216.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Energy storage device” means a resource capable of absorbing
electrical energy, storing it for a period of time, and delivering the energy for use at a later
time as needed, regardless of where the resource is located on the electric [distribution]
system.
(ii) “Energy storage device” includes all types of electric storage
technologies, regardless of their size, storage medium, or operational purpose, including:
1. thermal storage;
2. electrochemical storage;
3. [virtual power plants] THERMO–MECHANICAL
STORAGE; and
4. hydrogen–based storage.
(3) “Investor–owned electric company” means an electric company that is
not a municipal electric utility or an electric cooperative.
7–216.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–216 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE
STATE HAS A GOAL OF REACHING 150 MEGAWATTS OF DISTRIBUTION–CONNECTED
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.

SENATE BILL 316 5
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026,
THE COMMISSION SHALL NOTIFY EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY OF ITS PROPORTION OF
THE GOAL ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, BASED ON THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S SERVICE LOAD.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2025, AND ON OR BEFORE
NOVEMBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY
TO DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN TO ACHIEVE THE PROPORTION OF
DISTRIBUTION–CONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES NECESSARY TO REACH THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPORTIONMENT OF THE GOAL STATED IN SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2026, FOR PLANS SUBMITTED BY
NOVEMBER 1, 2025, AND ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2027, FOR PLANS SUBMITTED BY
NOVEMBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) EVALUATE EACH PLAN;
(II) ACCEPT PUBLIC COMMENTS ON EACH PLAN; AND
(III) ISSUE AN ORDER FOR EACH PLAN THAT EITHER:
1. APPROVES THE PLAN; OR
2. APPROVES THE PLAN WITH MODIFICATIONS THAT
THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(3) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES CONSTRUCTED OR PROCURED
UNDER EACH PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A COMBINATION OF DEVICES OWNED BY THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY AND DEVICES OWNED BY A THIRD PARTY, WITH NOT MORE
THAN 30% OF THE DEVICES BEING OWNED BY A THIRD PARTY.
(4) (I) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES THAT ARE CONSTRUCTED
OR PROCURED UNDER A PLAN SUBMITTED BY NOVEMBER 1, 2025, SHALL BE
OPERATIONAL BY AUGUST 1, 2027.
(II) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES THAT ARE CONSTRUCTED
OR PROCURED UNDER A PLAN SUBMITTED BY NOVEMBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE
OPERATIONAL BY AUGUST 1, 2028.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND A DEADLINE UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE.

SENATE BILL 316
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PLAN TO DEMONSTRATE THAT
THE CONSTRUCTION OR PROCUREMENT OF EACH ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE:
(1) IS BENEFICIAL IN TERMS OF COST, INCLUDING A DEMONSTRATION
OF ANY:
(I) AVOIDED OR DELAYED TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, AND
GENERATION COSTS; AND
(II) AVOIDED EMISSIONS; AND
(2) CAN BE COMPLETED WITHIN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE PLAN IS
APPROVED.
(E) (1) A DEVELOPER OF A THIRD–PARTY–OWNED ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE CONSTRUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT
WORKERS ARE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED
UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.
(2) AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CONSTRUCTED AND OWNED BY AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL BE CONSTRUCTED BY:
(I) EMPLOYEES OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY; OR
(II) CONTRACTORS THAT SHALL ENSURE THAT WORKERS
CONSTRUCTING THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE ARE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE
PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE ITS EMPLOYEE
BARGAINING UNIT AN OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS
FOR ANY ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE OWNED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY CONTRACT ANY WORK UNDER THIS SECTION NOT
CONDUCTED BY THE COMPANY’S EMPLOYEE BARGAINING UNIT TO A QUALIFIED
CONTRACTOR.
(II) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL REQUIRE A CONTRACTOR
OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON A PROJECT UNDER THIS SECTION TO:

SENATE BILL 316 7
1. PAY THE AREA PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED
BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY, INCLUDING WAGES AND FRINGE
BENEFITS; AND
2. OFFER HEALTH CARE AND RETIREMENT BENEFITS TO
THE EMPLOYEES WORKING ON THE PROJECT.
7–229. RESERVED.
7–230. RESERVED.
PART III. ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS.
7–231.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR FACILITY” MEANS A NUCLEAR REACTOR THAT
IS LOCATED IN AND PROVIDES ENVIRONMENTAL BENEFITS TO THE STATE.
(C) “ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT” OR “ZEC” MEANS A PAYMENT EQUAL TO THE
GENERATION ATTRIBUTES OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR FACILITY.
7–232.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR
FACILITY MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE COMMISSION TO RECEIVE
ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS.
(B) (1) A BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR FACILITY MAY NOT RECEIVE
ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS DURING ANY PERIOD IN WHICH THE FACILITY RECEIVES
ZERO–EMISSION NUCLEAR POWER PRODUCTION TAX CREDITS UNDER § 13105 OF
THE INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT OFFER ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS
AFTER 2055.
(3) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT, A
BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR FACILITY MUST MAINTAIN A NEUTRAL POSITION IN ANY
LABOR ORGANIZING THAT TAKES PLACE AT THE FACILITY.

SENATE BILL 316
7–233.
(A) AFTER NOTICE AND AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE OR DENY AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER §
7–232 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 9 MONTHS AFTER THE APPLICATION IS FILED.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE AN APPLICATION:
(1) IN WHOLE OR IN PART; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO ANY LIMITATIONS AND QUALIFICATIONS THAT THE
COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY AND IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
7–234.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE PRICE FOR A
ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT SHALL BE EQUAL TO [$15/MWH – 80% X (GROSS
RECEIPTS – $25/MWH)].
(B) THE $15/MWH AND $25/MWH CALCULATIONS SHALL BE ADJUSTED FOR
INFLATION.
7–235.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
PART NOT LATER THAN 365 DAYS BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE AVAILABILITY
OF ZERO–EMISSION NUCLEAR POWER PRODUCTION TAX CREDITS UNDER § 13105 OF
THE INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022.
(B) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE DATA SUBMISSION REQUIREMENTS NECESSARY TO
EVALUATE A BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR FACILITY’S PROJECTED ENVIRONMENTAL
BENEFITS AND ANNUAL GROSS RECEIPTS; AND
(2) PROVIDE FOR THE RECAPTURE OF THE ALLOCATION OF ANY
ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 3 YEARS TO A BENEFICIAL NUCLEAR
FACILITY THAT PERMANENTLY TERMINATES OPERATIONS, EXCEPT IN THE CASE OF
FORCE MAJEURE.
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 316 9
(m) “Renewable energy credit” or “credit” means a credit equal to the generation
attributes of 1 megawatt–hour of electricity that is derived from a Tier 1 renewable source
or a Tier 2 renewable source that is located:
(1) in the PJM region;
(2) outside the area described in item (1) of this subsection but in a control
area that is adjacent to the PJM region, if the electricity is delivered into the PJM region;
or
(3) on the outer continental shelf of the Atlantic Ocean in an area that:
(i) the United States Department of the Interior designates for
leasing after coordination and consultation with the State in accordance with § 388(a) of
the Energy Policy Act of 2005; and
(ii) is between 10 and 80 miles off the coast of the State.
(M–1) “RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT–II” OR “REC–II” MEANS A
RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT THAT IS DERIVED FROM AN ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM PROCURED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 12 OF THIS TITLE.
7–704.3.
(a) (1) The General Assembly finds and declares that it is:
(I) in the public interest to upgrade and expand the transmission
system to accommodate the buildout of at least 8,500 megawatts of offshore wind energy
from qualified offshore wind projects serving the State by 2031; AND
(II) THE PUBLIC POLICY OF THE STATE TO ENGAGE IN
COORDINATED TRANSMISSION PLANNING TO SUPPORT OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY ON
A MULTISTATE, REGIONAL, OR INTER–REGIONAL BASIS.
(2) TO FURTHER THE PUBLIC POLICY STATED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL PURSUE ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
COORDINATED APPROACHES TO THE TRANSMISSION OF ENERGY DERIVED FROM
OFFSHORE WIND:
(I) PJM INTERCONNECTION’S LONG–TERM TRANSMISSION
PLANNING PROCESS; OR
(II) AN ALTERNATIVE VOLUNTARY AGREEMENT.

SENATE BILL 316
(b) (1) To meet the goals established under § 7–703 of this subtitle and
subsection (a) of this section, the Commission, in consultation with the Maryland Energy
Administration, shall request that PJM Interconnection conduct an analysis of
transmission system upgrade and expansion options that take into consideration both
onshore and offshore infrastructure.
(2) The Commission:
(i) shall consult with other states served by PJM Interconnection to
evaluate regional transmission cooperation that could help achieve the State’s renewable
energy and offshore wind energy goals with greater efficiency;
(ii) shall work with PJM Interconnection to ensure that the analysis
requested under paragraph (1) of this subsection includes an analysis of solutions that:
1. use an open–access collector transmission system to allow
for the interconnection of multiple qualified offshore wind projects at a single [substation]
OR AT MULTIPLE SUBSTATIONS LOCATED IN OR NEAR THE DELMARVA PENINSULA;
2. TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, USE UPGRADES TO
EXISTING TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS BEFORE CONSIDERING NEW TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM ELEMENTS, INCLUDING USING UPGRADES TO THE EXISTING 138 KILOVOLTS
AND 230 KILOVOLTS TRANSMISSION ELEMENTS IN THE DELMARVA PENINSULA TO
HIGHER VOLTAGE LEVELS;
3. SUPPORT 8,500 MEGAWATTS OF OFFSHORE WIND
ENERGY GENERATION TO SERVE THE STATE’S LOAD EITHER THROUGH INTRASTATE
TRANSMISSION UPGRADES OR INTERSTATE TRANSMISSION UPGRADES BETWEEN
THE STATE AND DELAWARE;
[2.] 4. avoid a significant outage, or single contingency, of any
part of the transmission system;
[3.] 5. reduce permitting risks, impacts on communities, and
unnecessary high costs;
[4. leverage existing infrastructure;
5.] 6. offer benefits that address additional grid challenges; and
[6.] 7. address any other issues that the Commission identifies;
[and]
(iii) SHALL ENSURE THE COMPLETION OF A COST–BENEFIT
ANALYSIS OF VARIOUS APPROACHES FOR UPGRADING AND EXPANDING THE

SENATE BILL 316 11
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO MEET THE STATE’S OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY TARGETS
AND ENERGY NEEDS, INCLUDING:
1. AN ANALYSIS OF THE FOLLOWING THREE SCENARIOS:
A. INTERCONNECTING OFFSHORE WIND FACILITIES TO
THE PJM INTERCONNECTION SYSTEM ON A RADIAL BASIS, BASED ON STUDY
ESTIMATES OF PAST RADIAL INTERCONNECTION COSTS AND FUTURE PROJECTED
RADIAL INTERCONNECTION COSTS;
B. A COORDINATED TRANSMISSION SOLUTION THAT
CONNECTS ENERGY DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND DIRECTLY TO MAJOR LOAD
CENTERS IN THE STATE; AND
C. A COORDINATED TRANSMISSION SOLUTION THAT
DOES NOT CONNECT ENERGY DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND DIRECTLY TO MAJOR
LOAD CENTERS IN THE STATE; AND
2. AN ECONOMIC ANALYSIS THAT CONSIDERS, OVER THE
EXPECTED LIFE OF EACH FACILITY:
A. THE COSTS OF ANY TRANSMISSION CONSTRUCTION
OR UPGRADES THAT ARE AVOIDED BY ANY NEW OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY
GENERATION AND TRANSMISSION DEVELOPMENT;
B. ANY PRODUCTION COST SAVINGS THAT RESULT FROM
MEETING THE STATE’S OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY TARGETS;
C. ANY REDUCTION IN TRANSMISSION LOSSES;
D. CHANGES IN TOTAL PJM INTERCONNECTION
MARKET COSTS;
E. ENVIRONMENTAL BENEFITS;
F. RELIABILITY BENEFITS; AND
G. ANY OTHER BENEFITS OR COSTS IDENTIFIED BY THE
COMMISSION; AND
(IV) may consult with owners of transmission facilities in the State to
gather relevant technical information.

SENATE BILL 316
(3) The Commission may enter into any necessary agreements with PJM
Interconnection for transmission planning to:
(i) initiate PJM Interconnection’s analysis; or
(ii) assist with the solicitation of proposals for offshore wind
transmission projects.
(4) On or before July 1, 2024, the Commission shall submit a status update
on the analysis requested under paragraph (1) of this subsection to the General Assembly,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2025, the Commission shall issue, or request that
PJM Interconnection issue, one or more competitive solicitations for proposals for open
access offshore wind transmission facilities and complementary onshore transmission
upgrades and expansions.
(2) The Commission may issue, or request that PJM Interconnection issue,
further solicitations for proposals after this date if determined necessary by the
Commission.
(e) (2) The Commission may evaluate, or request that PJM Interconnection
assist with the evaluation of, proposals that include:
(i) upgrading the existing transmission grid AND DEPLOYING
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(ii) extending the existing transmission grid onshore and offshore to
be closer to offshore wind energy locations;
(iii) interconnecting between offshore substations;
(iv) adding energy storage; and
(v) the use of HVDC converter technology to support potential
weaknesses in the transmission grid.
7–704.4.
(d) (1) The State shall:
(i) issue a draft solicitation for procurement of offshore wind energy
for public comment and review on or before June 1, 2024;
(ii) issue a procurement for offshore wind energy on or before July
31, 2024;

SENATE BILL 316 13
(iii) provide a procurement submission process window of not less
than 180 days; and
(iv) award contracts in a timely manner.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, on or before
September 1, 2025, the State may enter into a contract or contracts for the procurement
issued under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) The State may modify the date established in subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph if an unforeseen circumstance adversely affects the procurement
submission process.
(e) (1) In addition to the solicitation and procurement issued under subsection
(d) of this section, the State[:
(i) shall issue a draft solicitation for procurement of offshore wind
energy for public comment and review on or before September 1, 2025; and
(ii)] shall issue a procurement for offshore wind energy on or before
December 31, 2025.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection and in addition to any
contract entered into under subsection (d) of this section, on or before March 31, 2027, the
State may enter into a contract or contracts for the procurement issued under paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
(3) The State may modify the date established in paragraph (2) of this
subsection if an unforeseen circumstance adversely affects the procurement submission
process.
7–705.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to a shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems.
(2) [If] BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, IF an electricity supplier fails to
comply with the renewable energy portfolio standard for the applicable year, the electricity
supplier shall pay into the [Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under
§ 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article] ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, a compliance fee
of:

SENATE BILL 316
1. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources other than the shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 4 cents through 2016;
B. 3.75 cents in 2017 and 2018;
C. 3 cents in 2019 through 2023;
D. 2.75 cents in 2024;
E. 2.5 cents in 2025;
F. 2.475 cents in 2026;
G. 2.45 cents in 2027;
H. 2.25 cents in 2028 and 2029; and
I. 2.235 cents in 2030 and later;
2. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 45 cents in 2008;
B. 40 cents in 2009 through 2014;
C. 35 cents in 2015 and 2016;
D. 19.5 cents in 2017;
E. 17.5 cents in 2018;
F. 10 cents in 2019;
G. 10 cents in 2020;
H. 8 cents in 2021;
I. 6 cents in 2022;
J. 6 cents in 2023;
K. 6 cents in 2024;

SENATE BILL 316 15
L. 5.5 cents in 2025;
M. 4.5 cents in 2026;
N. 3.5 cents in 2027;
O. 3.25 cents in 2028;
P. 2.5 cents in 2029; and
Q. 2.25 cents in 2030 and later; and
3. 1.5 cents for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
Tier 2 renewable sources; or
(ii) for industrial process load:
1. for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required Tier 1
renewable sources, a compliance fee of:
A. 0.8 cents in 2006, 2007, and 2008;
B. 0.5 cents in 2009 and 2010;
C. 0.4 cents in 2011 and 2012;
D. 0.3 cents in 2013 and 2014;
E. 0.25 cents in 2015 and 2016; and
F. except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, 0.2
cents in 2017 and later; and
2. nothing for any shortfall from required Tier 2 renewable
sources.
(3) For industrial process load, the compliance fee for each kilowatt–hour
of shortfall from required Tier 1 renewable sources is nothing for the year following any
year during which, after final calculations, the net rate impact per megawatt–hour from
Round 1 offshore wind projects exceeded $1.65 in 2012 dollars.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, THE COMPLIANCE FEES PAID INTO
THE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR CREDITED
TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF

SENATE BILL 316
ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO
STANDARD.
(II) THE PROCESS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH RELATED TO THE REFUNDING OR CREDITING OF AMOUNTS TO
DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS SHALL BE DIRECTED AND OVERSEEN BY THE
COMMISSION.
(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN ESCROW ACCOUNT TO BE
UNDER, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SUPERVISION OF
THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) DEFINING RULES TO FACILITATE AND ENSURE THE SECURE
AND TRANSPARENT TRANSFER OF COMPLIANCE FEE PAYMENTS TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO BE DISTRIBUTED BACK TO DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS.
7–709.
(a) An electricity supplier may use accumulated renewable energy credits to meet
the renewable energy portfolio standard, including credits created by a renewable on–site
generator.
(b) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “CERTIFIED SREC” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–709.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) “SREC–II” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–709.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) A renewable energy credit may be sold or otherwise transferred.
(3) AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER THAT PROCURES RENEWABLE
ENERGY CREDITS TO MEET THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD SHALL
PROCURE CREDITS TO MEET THE STANDARD IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER:
(I) FIRST, ORECS, REC–IIS, AND SREC–IIS;
(II) SECOND, CERTIFIED SRECS; AND

SENATE BILL 316 17
(III) THIRD, RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS OTHER THAN
ORECS, REC–IIS, SREC–IIS, AND CERTIFIED SRECS.
7–709.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Brownfield” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this title.
(3) “Certified SREC” means a solar renewable energy credit generated by
a certified system.
(4) “Certified system” means a solar energy generating system certified by
the Commission under the Program to generate certified SRECs with the compliance value
specified in subsection (c) of this section.
(5) “Program” means the Small Solar Energy Generating System Incentive
Program.
7–709.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE UTILITY–SCALE SREC–II PROGRAM.
(3) “QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 7–709.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) “QUALIFYING SYSTEM” MEANS A UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM CERTIFIED TO GENERATE SREC–IIS.
(5) “SREC–II” MEANS A SOLAR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT EQUAL
TO THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A QUALIFYING SYSTEM OR A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM.
(6) “UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” MEANS A
SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM THAT HAS A GENERATING CAPACITY THAT EXCEEDS
5 MEGAWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE
SYSTEM’S INVERTER.
(B) THERE IS A UTILITY–SCALE SREC–II PROGRAM IN THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 316
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT
OF AT LEAST 3,000 MEGAWATTS OF NEW UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR GENERATION BY
2035.
(D) (1) UNDER THE PROGRAM, A QUALIFYING SYSTEM SHALL GENERATE
SREC–IIS.
(2) A QUALIFYING SYSTEM THAT GENERATES SREC–IIS UNDER THE
PROGRAM MAY NOT SIMULTANEOUSLY RECEIVE REC–IIS, RECS, OR ANY OTHER
EQUIVALENT CERTIFICATES.
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS SHALL
APPLY TO SREC–IIS GENERATED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(4) AN SREC–II GENERATED UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY BE
APPLIED ONLY TOWARD MEETING THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
BEGINNING WITH THE YEAR IN WHICH THE SREC–II IS GENERATED.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR
CERTIFICATION AS A QUALIFYING SYSTEM UNDER THE PROGRAM.
7–709.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE” MEANS THE
MONETARY VALUE OF AN SREC–II GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM
UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(3) “CAPACITY BLOCK” MEANS THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF
GENERATING CAPACITY, MEASURED IN MEGAWATTS, THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES CAN BE ALLOTTED TO A SPECIFIC MARKET SEGMENT FOR A GIVEN
INCENTIVE YEAR.
(4) “COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(5) “ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–306 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 316 19
(6) “MARKET SEGMENT” MEANS THE GROUP CLASSIFICATION FOR
THE TYPE OF SMALL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS ELIGIBLE FOR
CERTIFICATION UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(7) “NET METERED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” MEANS A
SMALL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM USED BY AN ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATOR FOR NET METERING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–306 OF
THIS TITLE.
(8) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SMALL SOLAR FACILITIES INCENTIVE
PROGRAM.
(9) “PROJECT OFF–TAKER” MEANS THE END USER OF SREC–IIS
THAT ARE GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM.
(10) “QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM” MEANS A SMALL SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM CERTIFIED TO GENERATE SREC–IIS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(11) “SMALL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” MEANS A
PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM THAT HAS A GENERATING CAPACITY OF 5 MEGAWATTS OR
LESS, AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SYSTEM’S
INVERTER.
(12) “SREC–II” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–709.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A SMALL SOLAR FACILITIES INCENTIVE PROGRAM.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT
OF, BY 2035, AT LEAST 3,000 MEGAWATTS OF NEW SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION BY
OWNERS OF SMALL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT ARE:
(1) COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS; OR
(2) NET METERED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA AND
AN APPLICATION PROCESS BY WHICH AN OWNER OF A SMALL SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM MAY APPLY TO BECOME A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM AND
GENERATE SREC–IIS UNDER THE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 316
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO BE ELIGIBLE UNDER
THE PROGRAM, A SMALL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) BE LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(II) BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD;
(III) HAVE A GENERATING CAPACITY OF 5 MEGAWATTS OR LESS,
AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SYSTEM’S INVERTER;
(IV) BE PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027; AND
(V) BE BENEFICIAL TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IN
THE STATE.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE PROGRAM SHALL BEGIN
ACCEPTING APPLICATIONS FROM QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEMS TO FULFILL
CAPACITY WITHIN A CAPACITY BLOCK ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY 3 YEARS
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN ADMINISTRATIVELY
DETERMINED INCENTIVE AND ANNUAL CAPACITY BLOCK FOR EACH OF THE
FOLLOWING MARKET SEGMENTS UNDER THE PROGRAM:
(I) BEHIND–THE–METER RESIDENTIAL;
(II) BEHIND–THE–METER NONRESIDENTIAL;
(III) AGGREGATED NET METERING; AND
(IV) COMMUNITY SOLAR.
(2) AT ANY TIME AFTER PROVIDING PUBLIC NOTICE THE
COMMISSION MAY ADJUST THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE AND
ANNUAL CAPACITY BLOCKS IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES AN ADJUSTMENT IS
NECESSARY.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE FOR A
QUALIFIED SMALL SYSTEM SHALL BE FIXED FOR 15 YEARS AT THE AMOUNT OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE THAT WAS ESTABLISHED IN THE YEAR

SENATE BILL 316 21
IN WHICH THE QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM WAS CONSTRUCTED OR RECEIVED
CERTIFICATION AS A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM, WHICHEVER IS LATER.
(4) (I) IN ESTABLISHING AN ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED
INCENTIVE AND ANNUAL CAPACITY BLOCKS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL BALANCE THE NEED FOR CONTINUED
MARKET DEVELOPMENT FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT WHILE LIMITING THE
PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR ALL CUSTOMERS TO 5% OF THE TOTAL
ELECTRICITY BILL OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE NET RATE IMPACT CALCULATIONS SHALL TAKE INTO
ACCOUNT ANY COSTS AND BENEFITS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PROGRAM AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
1. ENERGY GENERATED;
2. THE CAPACITY OF QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEMS IN
THE PROGRAM; AND
3. THE TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION OF THE
ENERGY THROUGH THE TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS.
(G) IN DETERMINING THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE
FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT, CONSIDER PRICE DIFFERENTIALS
BASED ON THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) PROJECT SIZE;
(II) PROJECT OFF–TAKER TYPE;
(III) PROJECT LOCATION; AND
(IV) ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY;
(2) ESTABLISH MONETARY VALUES THAT ENCOURAGE MARKET
DEVELOPMENT WHILE BALANCING RATEPAYER INTERESTS; AND
(3) STRIVE TO ACHIEVE MARKET DIVERSITY, INCLUDING
GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY AND PROJECT OFF–TAKER DIVERSITY.

SENATE BILL 316
(H) IN ESTABLISHING THE CAPACITY BLOCK FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT
UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ENABLE MEANINGFUL AND CONTINUED MARKET GROWTH FOR
EACH MARKET SEGMENT;
(2) CONSIDER THE VALUE OF REDUCING ELECTRICITY DEMAND AND
THE COST OF INSTALLING GENERATING CAPACITY ON THE TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS; AND
(3) FOR THE BEHIND–THE–METER RESIDENTIAL MARKET SEGMENT,
ENSURE THAT THE NEXT CAPACITY BLOCK IS ESTABLISHED AS SOON AS
REASONABLY POSSIBLE AFTER THE CURRENT CAPACITY BLOCK HAS BEEN FULLY
RESERVED.
(I) (1) A QUALIFYING SMALL SYSTEM THAT GENERATES SREC–IIS
UNDER THIS PROGRAM MAY NOT SIMULTANEOUSLY RECEIVE REC–IIS, RECS, OR
ANY OTHER EQUIVALENT CREDITS.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION, THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS SHALL APPLY TO
SREC–IIS GENERATED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(3) AN SREC–II GENERATED UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY BE
APPLIED ONLY TOWARD MEETING THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
BEGINNING WITH THE YEAR IN WHICH THE SREC–II IS GENERATED.
SUBTITLE 12. ENERGY PROCUREMENT.
PART I. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY
AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CAN DELIVER CONTINUOUSLY TO THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM OVER A 4–HOUR PERIOD.
(C) “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–216 OF
THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 316 23
(D) “REC–II” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) “REC–II PAYMENT” MEANS THE MONETARY VALUE OF A REC–II
GENERATED AND SOLD BY AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM AWARDED A CONTRACT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1202.
(A) AN APPLICATION FOR A PROPOSED PROJECT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS
SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL BUSINESSES
AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE
CLEAN ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(2) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION OF THE
PROJECT BY:
(I) FACILITATING A STEADY SUPPLY OF HIGHLY SKILLED
CRAFT WORKERS WHO SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) GUARANTEEING THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK
PERFORMED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN
AGREEMENT THAT:
1. ESTABLISHES THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE OF THE PROJECT OR A PORTION OF THE
PROJECT;
2. GUARANTEES AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND
SIMILAR DISRUPTIONS;
3. ENSURES THAT ALL WORK ON THE PROJECT FULLY
CONFORMS TO ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS, INCLUDING ALL REQUIRED TRAINING FOR EMPLOYEES;
4. CREATES MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR
RESOLVING LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE PROJECT;

SENATE BILL 316
5. SETS FORTH OTHER MECHANISMS FOR
LABOR–MANAGEMENT COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST AND
CONCERN, INCLUDING PRODUCTIVITY, QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH;
AND
6. BINDS ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO
THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS;
(3) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY ENSURING
THAT AT LEAST 80% OF THE CRAFT WORKERS ON THE PROJECT HAVE COMPLETED
AN OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 10–HOUR COURSE;
(4) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL
RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, MINORITIES, AND FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS;
(5) INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR LOCAL HIRING AND THE HIRING OF
HISTORICALLY DISADVANTAGED GROUPS;
(6) USE LOCALLY, SUSTAINABLY, AND DOMESTICALLY
MANUFACTURED CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND COMPONENTS TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE;
(7) REQUIRE THE USE OF SKILLED LOCAL LABOR, PARTICULARLY
WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE
PROJECT, USING METHODS INCLUDING OUTREACH, HIRING, OR REFERRAL
METHODS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE; AND
(8) AUTHORIZE THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND THE
COMMISSION TO CONSIDER, REVIEW, AND ENFORCE A STORAGE DEVELOPER OR
ENERGY DEVELOPER’S COMPLIANCE WITH ANY COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
7–1203.
THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT
CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS TO IMPLEMENT AND EXECUTE ANY PART OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
7–1204. RESERVED.

SENATE BILL 316 25
7–1205. RESERVED.
PART II. TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
7–1206.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE STATE HAS
A GOAL OF REACHING 1,600 MEGAWATTS OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL, BY REGULATION OR ORDER, ESTABLISH A
COMPETITIVE PROCESS FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF PROJECTS FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(C) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ISSUE A PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION FOR APPLICATIONS FOR PROJECTS FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(II) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION SHALL BE FOR A
MAXIMUM OF 800 MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS
MEASURED IN EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A DECISION ON WHETHER TO APPROVE ONE OR MORE PROPOSALS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–1208(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES PROCURED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE OPERATIONAL WITHIN 18 MONTHS
AFTER A PROJECT IS SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE OPERATING DEADLINE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A SECOND PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF PROJECTS
FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.

SENATE BILL 316
(2) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION SHALL BE FOR A MAXIMUM OF
800 MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS MEASURED IN
EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY.
(3) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A DECISION ON WHETHER TO APPROVE ONE OR MORE PROPOSALS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–1208(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES PROCURED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE OPERATIONAL WITHIN 18 MONTHS
AFTER A PROJECT IS SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE OPERATING DEADLINE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
7–1207.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE SPECIFICATIONS IN A
PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION ISSUED UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT
REQUIRE EACH PROPOSAL TO:
(1) INCLUDE A PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE FOR THE
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE PROJECT;
(2) INCLUDE A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS OF THE PROJECT AND THE
PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE, INCLUDING AN ANALYSIS OF:
(I) THE LOCATIONAL VALUE, DURATION, AND TIME TO
DEPLOYMENT OF THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES;
(II) AVOIDED OR DELAYED TRANSMISSION, GENERATION, AND
DISTRIBUTION COSTS;
(III) AVOIDED EMISSIONS IN THE SHORT TERM AND PROJECTED
AVOIDED EMISSIONS IN THE LONG TERM, MEASURED USING THE SOCIAL COST OF
CARBON, AS DETERMINED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY AS
OF JANUARY 1, 2025;
(IV) THE VALUE OF THE RAPID DEPLOYMENT OF ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICES; AND
(V) ANY OTHER AVOIDED COSTS;

SENATE BILL 316 27
(3) ENSURE THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE PROJECT HAS
THE CAPABILITY TO EXPORT ELECTRICITY FOR SALE ON THE WHOLESALE MARKET
AND BID INTO THE PJM CAPACITY MARKET UNDER AN AGREEMENT WITH PJM
INTERCONNECTION;
(4) ENSURE THAT THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES CAN DELIVER
THEIR EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY;
(5) INCORPORATE A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT;
(6) ATTEST IN WRITING THAT ALL CONTRACTORS AND
SUBCONTRACTORS WORKING ON THE PROJECT HAVE BEEN IN COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL AND STATE WAGE AND HOUR LAWS FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3
YEARS OR THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTOR’S OR SUBCONTRACTOR’S BUSINESS
OPERATION, WHICHEVER IS LONGER; AND
(7) ENSURE A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS BY REDACTING
PROPRIETARY INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION.
(B) FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES
PAIRED WITH TIER 1 OR TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED UNDER § 7–701
OF THIS TITLE, MAY BE INCLUDED IN A PROPOSAL IN RESPONSE TO A PROCUREMENT
SOLICITATION UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1208.
(A) IN SELECTING A PROPOSAL FOR A FRONT–OF–THE–METER
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE PROJECT, THE COMMISSION:
(1) SHALL SPECIFY THE PRICING SCHEDULE, WHICH SHALL BE A
MONTHLY FIXED PRICE REPRESENTING THE VALUE OF THE FRONT–OF–THE–METER
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE BEYOND THE PAYMENTS RECEIVED FROM
PJM WHOLESALE MARKETS;
(2) SHALL SPECIFY THAT FOR CONTINUED RECEIPT OF PAYMENT
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN APPLICANT SHALL DEMONSTRATE, TO
THE SATISFACTION OF THE COMMISSION, THAT THE APPLICANT’S ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE IS AVAILABLE AND PARTICIPATING IN THE PJM ENERGY AND CAPACITY
MARKET AT NOT LESS THAN THE CLASS AVERAGE AVAILABILITY RATE ESTABLISHED
BY PJM INTERCONNECTION FOR COMPARABLE DEVICES;

SENATE BILL 316
(3) SHALL INCORPORATE PENALTIES FOR NONPERFORMANCE IN THE
CONTRACT, INCLUDING WITHHOLDING OF PAYMENT, FOR ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICES THAT FAIL TO MEET AVAILABILITY METRICS;
(4) MAY TERMINATE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES FROM THE PROGRAM
IF DEVICE PERFORMANCE DOES NOT IMPROVE AFTER APPROPRIATE NOTICE AND
OPPORTUNITY TO CURE; AND
(5) MAY CONSIDER OTHER NONPRICE FACTORS SUCH AS:
(I) PROJECT MATURITY DATES;
(II) SITE CONTROL; AND
(III) ANY OTHER RELEVANT NONPRICE FACTORS AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) AFTER GIVING PUBLIC NOTICE, HOLD ONE OR MORE PUBLIC
HEARINGS TO RECEIVE PUBLIC COMMENT AND EVALUATE THE PROPOSALS; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, ISSUE ONE OR
MORE ORDERS TO SELECT A PROPOSAL OR PROPOSALS FOR DEVELOPMENT.
(C) IF THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT NONE OF THE PROPOSALS
ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THE
COMMISSION MAY END THE SOLICITATION PROCESS WITHOUT SELECTING A
PROPOSAL.
7–1209.
(A) FOR ANY PROPOSAL SELECTED UNDER THIS PART, THE COMMISSION
MAY ADOPT CONDITIONS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF FACILITIES
INCLUDED IN THE PROPOSAL.
(B) AN ORDER SELECTING A PROPOSAL UNDER § 7–1208 OF THIS SUBTITLE
BESTOWS THE SAME RIGHTS TO THE SELECTED PROPOSAL THAT A GENERATING
SYSTEM WOULD OTHERWISE BE GRANTED THROUGH A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE IF THE SELECTED
PROPOSAL IS REVIEWED UNDER AN ALTERNATIVE PROCESS AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 316 29
7–1210.
ANY TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE BUILT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL COUNT TOWARD THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE
DEPLOYMENT GOALS UNDER § 7–216.2 OF THIS TITLE.
7–1211.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS PART.
7–1212. RESERVED.
7–1213. RESERVED.
PART III. RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS.
7–1214.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BROWNFIELD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “QUALIFYING SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–709.2 OF THIS
TITLE.
(D) “REC ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR” MEANS THE ENTITY CHOSEN, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1219 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO SUPERVISE THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT CREATED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO ENSURE THE SECURE AND
TRANSPARENT TRANSFER OF REVENUES, SREC–IIS, AND REC–IIS AMONG
QUALIFYING SYSTEMS, WIND SYSTEMS, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEMS, AND
ELECTRIC COMPANIES.
(E) “RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701
OF THIS TITLE.
(F) “SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–701(S)(8) OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 316
(G) “SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–709.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(H) “SREC–II” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–709.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(I) “SREC–II PAYMENT” MEANS THE MONETARY VALUE OF AN SREC–II
GENERATED AND SOLD BY A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM AWARDED A
CONTRACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) “WIND SYSTEM” MEANS A LAND–BASED WIND ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM.
7–1215.
(A) THROUGH REGULATION OR ORDER, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ESTABLISH A COMPETITIVE PROCESS FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF:
(1) SREC–IIS FROM QUALIFYING SYSTEMS; AND
(2) REC–IIS FROM SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEMS AND WIND
SYSTEMS.
(B) THE COMPETITIVE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS PART SHALL
REQUIRE THAT:
(1) BIDS FROM QUALIFYING SYSTEMS, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC
SYSTEMS, AND WIND SYSTEMS SHALL BE ONLY FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF
SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS; AND
(2) BIDS SUBMITTED FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF SREC–IIS OR
REC–IIS SHALL INCLUDE AN SREC–II OR REC–II PRICING SCHEDULE THAT
SPECIFIES A PRICE FOR THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES OF THE ORIGINATING
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM, INCLUDING ENERGY, CAPACITY, ANCILLARY
SERVICES, AND ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES.
7–1216.
AN ORDER THE COMMISSION ISSUES APPROVING A PROPOSED
PROCUREMENT UNDER THIS PART SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY THE SREC–II OR REC–II PRICING SCHEDULE;

SENATE BILL 316 31
(2) SPECIFY THE DURATION OF THE SREC–II OR REC–II PRICING
SCHEDULE, NOT TO EXCEED 30 YEARS;
(3) SPECIFY THE NUMBER OF SREC–IIS OR REC–IIS THAT MAY BE
PURCHASED EACH YEAR FROM THE QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC
SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM;
(4) PROVIDE THAT:
(I) A PAYMENT MAY NOT BE MADE FOR AN SREC–II OR
REC–II UNTIL ELECTRICITY SUPPLY IS GENERATED UNDER THE PROCUREMENT;
AND
(II) RATEPAYERS, PURCHASERS OF SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS,
AND THE STATE SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS FOR ANY COST OVERRUNS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM;
(5) REQUIRE THAT ANY DEBT INSTRUMENT ISSUED IN CONNECTION
WITH THE QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM
INCLUDE LANGUAGE SPECIFYING THAT THE DEBT INSTRUMENT DOES NOT
ESTABLISH A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF THE STATE; AND
(6) REQUIRE THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A QUALIFYING
SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM EXECUTE AND COMPLY
WITH A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1217.
TO BE ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT
PROCESS UNDER THIS PART, A QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC
SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) BE LOCATED IN THE STATE OR OTHERWISE DEMONSTRATE AN
ABILITY TO ADDRESS THE RESOURCE ADEQUACY NEEDS OF THE STATE;
(2) BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD UNDER § 7–703(B) OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) FOR SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEMS:
(I) HAVE A GENERATING CAPACITY OF LESS THAN 30
MEGAWATTS; AND

SENATE BILL 316
(II) BE LICENSED OR EXEMPT FROM LICENSING BY THE
FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION.
7–1218.
UNLESS EXTENDED BY MUTUAL CONSENT OF THE PARTIES, THE COMMISSION
SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY A PROCUREMENT UNDER
THIS PART WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER THE CLOSE OF A SOLICITATION PERIOD.
7–1219.
(A) FOR THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS PART, BY
REGULATION OR ORDER, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH AN SREC–II AND REC–II PURCHASER’S OBLIGATION
FOR SREC–II AND REC–II PURCHASERS TO PURCHASE SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS
FOR EACH YEAR:
(I) ON A FORWARD–LOOKING BASIS; AND
(II) AT LEAST 1 YEAR BEFORE THE YEAR IN WHICH THAT
SREC–II AND REC–II PURCHASE OBLIGATION BECOMES EFFECTIVE TO ALLOW AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO REFLECT SREC–II AND REC–II COSTS AS A
NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE PAID BY ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY;
(2) ESTABLISH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE THAT ALLOWS AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO RECOVER ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF
SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS FROM ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(3) ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT THAT IS UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF THE REC ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR; AND
(4) DIRECT THE ELECTRIC COMPANIES, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, TO JOINTLY SELECT A REC ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR.
(B) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROCURE FROM THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION OR ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION THE
NUMBER OF SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS REQUIRED TO SATISFY THE SREC–II AND
REC–II PURCHASER’S OBLIGATIONS.

SENATE BILL 316 33
(2) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE REQUIREMENT THE
COMMISSION ESTABLISHES:
(I) IF THERE ARE INSUFFICIENT SREC–IIS OR REC–IIS
AVAILABLE TO SATISFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANIES’ SREC–II AND REC–II
PURCHASER’S OBLIGATION, THE OVERPAYMENT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO
ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION
CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY
THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD; AND
(II) THE CALCULATION OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SREC–II
AND REC–II PURCHASE OBLIGATION SHALL BE BASED ON FINAL ELECTRICITY
SALES DATA AS REPORTED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION AS MEASURED AT THE
CUSTOMER’S METER.
(3) FOR EACH SREC–II AND REC–II FOR WHICH A QUALIFYING
SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM RECEIVES PAYMENT,
THE QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM
SHALL:
(I) SELL ALL ENERGY, CAPACITY, AND ANCILLARY SERVICES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE CREATION OF THE SREC–IIS OR REC–IIS INTO THE
MARKETS OPERATED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE PROCEEDS RECEIVED FROM THE SALES
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED
OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S
CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
7–1220.
BY REGULATION OR ORDER, THE COMMISSION SHALL SPECIFY THE
TRANSFER AND EXPIRATION OF SREC–IIS AND REC–IIS CREATED BY QUALIFYING
SYSTEMS, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEMS, OR WIND SYSTEMS IN EXCESS OF THE
ESTABLISHED SREC–II OR REC–II PRICING SCHEDULE.
7–1221.
A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF A QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL
HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM OR OF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
QUALIFYING SYSTEM, SMALL HYDROELECTRIC SYSTEM, OR WIND SYSTEM MAY NOT
BE CONSIDERED A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 316
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–102.
(a) The following procurement methods are authorized at the procurement
officer’s discretion, where applicable:
(1) competitive sealed bids under § 13–103 of this subtitle;
(2) competitive sealed proposals under § 13–104 or § 13–105 of this
subtitle;
(3) noncompetitive negotiation under § 13–106 of this subtitle;
(4) sole source procurement under § 13–107 of this subtitle;
(5) emergency or expedited procurement under § 13–108 of this subtitle;
(6) small procurement under § 13–109 of this subtitle;
(7) an intergovernmental cooperative purchasing agreement under §
13–110 of this subtitle;
(8) auction bids under § 13–111 of this subtitle;
(9) architectural, engineering, and land surveying services qualification
based selection under § 13–112 of this subtitle;
(10) master contracting under § 13–113 of this subtitle; [or]
(11) pay–for–success contracting under § 13–112.1 of this subtitle; OR
(12) LEGISLATIVE FAST–TRACK PROCUREMENTS UNDER § 13–117 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
13–117.
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO:
(1) RECOGNIZE THE NEED FOR STATE AGENCIES TO BE RESPONSIVE
TO THE REQUESTS AND LEGISLATIVE DIRECTIVES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(2) REDUCE THE TIME IT TAKES FOR STATE AGENCIES TO PROCURE
CONSULTANTS TO ASSIST WITH LEGISLATIVE MANDATES THAT HAVE DEADLINES
SPECIFIED IN LAW; AND

SENATE BILL 316 35
(3) BE TIMELY IN ADDRESSING CLIMATE CHANGE, ENVIRONMENTAL,
ENERGY, AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS RELATED ISSUES.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROCUREMENT OF CONSULTANTS
THAT:
(1) ARE LEGISLATIVELY MANDATED WITH SPECIFIC TIME FRAMES
ESTABLISHED IN LAW; AND
(2) WILL ADDRESS ISSUES RELATED ONLY TO CLIMATE CHANGE,
ENVIRONMENTAL, ENERGY, AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(C) THE FOLLOWING UNITS ARE AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE COMPETITIVE
SEALED BIDS HIGHER THAN THEIR DESIGNATED SMALL PROCUREMENT
DELEGATION AUTHORITIES:
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;
(2) THE OFFICE OF PEOPLE’S COUNSEL;
(3) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.
(D) BEFORE AWARDING A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF:
(1) THE HEAD OF THE UNIT; AND
(2) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE.
(E) (1) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE,
SHALL APPROVE A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION IF
IT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE,
DOES NOT APPROVE A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION
WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE CONTRACT, THE CONTRACT SHALL
BE CONSIDERED APPROVED.

SENATE BILL 316
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) interest and investment earnings on the Fund;
(5) compliance fees paid under [§ 7–705] § 7–705(B–1) of the Public
Utilities Article;
(6) money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
(7) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(c)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
(8) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
[(g–1) Proceeds received by the Fund from compliance fees under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of
the Public Utilities Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) beginning in fiscal year 2025, at least 20% of the proceeds shall be used
to provide grants to support the installation of new solar energy generating systems under
the Customer–Sited Solar Program;
(2) up to 10% of the proceeds shall be credited to an administrative expense
account for costs related to the administration of the Fund;
(3) proceeds collected but unused from a previous year shall be used before
proceeds allocated for the current year; and
(4) the Administration shall reallocate to other authorized uses any
proceeds that are not used within 3 fiscal years after collection.]
[(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, compliance fees
paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be used only to make loans and

SENATE BILL 316 37
grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.]
[(i–1)] (I) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(iii) “Low and moderate income” means having an annual household
income that is at or below 120% of the area median income.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b–1) of the Public Utilities Article
shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make loans and
grants to promote increased opportunities for the growth and development of small,
minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in the State that install
geothermal systems in the State.
Article – Tax – General
2–1201.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFIED DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 11–239 OF THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 316
(B) The Comptroller shall pay refunds relating to the public service company
franchise tax from the General Fund of the State.
(C) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE 75% OF THE FRANCHISE TAX
REVENUE FROM PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES IMPOSED UNDER § 8–402.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE, THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE KILOWATT–HOURS OF ELECTRICITY
DELIVERED TO QUALIFIED DATA CENTERS THAT ARE OPERATIONAL ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2026, TO THE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THE PUBLIC
SERVICE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
2–1302.5.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFIED DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 11–239 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE 75% OF THE SALES AND USE
TAX REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE SALE OF ELECTRICITY DELIVERED TO
QUALIFIED DATA CENTERS THAT ARE OPERATIONAL ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026,
TO THE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through [2–1302.4]
2–1302.5 of this subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206
of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use tax
revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and

SENATE BILL 316 39
(3) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund of the
State.
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(5) (i) “Qualified data center” means a data center located in the State
in which an individual or a corporation, within 3 years after submitting an application for
the sales and use tax exemption under this section, has:
1. for a data center located within a Tier I area, invested at
least $2,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least five
qualified positions; or
2. for a data center located in any other area of the State,
invested at least $5,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least
five qualified positions.
(ii) “Qualified data center” includes:
1. a data center that is a co–located or hosting data center
where equipment, space, and bandwidth are available to lease to multiple customers; and
2. an enterprise data center owned and operated by the
company it supports.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
supports the extension or renewal of the Federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission license
for the Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant’s nuclear reactors in the years 2034 and 2036.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.